Wyoming statutes. Title 31 Motor Vehicles
Article 3. Commercial Driver's License

Savings clauses. —

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 5, provides: “Nothing in this act invalidates any license lawfully issued before January 1, 1990, except that no license issued to a person prior to January 1, 1990, who is required to be licensed under W.S.

31-17-101

through 31-17-120 shall remain valid after September 30, 1993.”

§ 31-7-301.
Notification required by driver.

Any driver of a commercial motor vehicle holding a driver’s license issued by this state, who is convicted of violating any state or federal law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, in any state, or of violating any federal, provincial, territorial or municipal laws of Canada, other than parking violations, shall notify the department in writing, and shall also notify his employer in writing, within thirty (30) days of the date of the conviction.

A driver whose driver’s license is suspended, revoked or canceled by any state, who loses the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in any state for any period, or who is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for any period, shall notify his employer of the action taken before the end of the business day following the day the driver received notice of the action.

A person who applies to be a commercial motor vehicle driver shall provide the employer, at the time of the application for employment, with the following information for the ten (10) year period preceding the date of application in a sworn statement:

A list of the names and addresses of the applicant’s previous employers for which the applicant was a driver of a commercial motor vehicle;

The dates between which the applicant drove for each employer; and

The reason for leaving each employer.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-103

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

§ 31-7-302.
Employer responsibilities.

Each employer must require the applicant to provide the information required in W.S.

31-7-301

.

No employer may knowingly allow, permit or authorize a driver to drive a commercial motor vehicle, unless exempted pursuant to the terms of this chapter, during any period in which the driver has:

Not been licensed to drive a commercial vehicle;

A driver license suspended, revoked or canceled by a state;

Lost the privilege to drive a commercial motor vehicle in a state;

Been disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle; or

More than one (1) driver license.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-104; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2015 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in (b), inserted “unless exempted pursuant to the terms of this chapter.”

Probationary driving privileges cannot extend to commercial vehicles. —

This chapter limits the hearing examiner's discretion to issue probationary driver's licenses during suspensions, in that probationary driving privileges cannot extend to the operation of commercial motor vehicles. Wilson v. State, 841 P.2d 90,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1992).

§ 31-7-303.
Exemptions.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the department shall by rule and regulation grant an exemption from the licensing and other requirements of this article or from the requirements of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant to this article to a class of persons or class of commercial motor vehicles exempted by the secretary of the United States department of transportation pursuant to title 49 of the United States Code including:

A farm or ranch vehicle when:

Controlled and operated by a farmer or rancher, including operation by employees or family members;

Used in agricultural operations as defined in W.S. 31-18-801(a)(i), exempted under W.S. 31-18-103(a) and used to transport either agricultural products, farm or ranch machinery, farm or ranch supplies, or any combination of these items, to or from a farm or ranch; and

Not used in the operations of a contract or common motor carrier.

Firefighters and other persons who operate commercial motor vehicles which are necessary to the preservation of life or property or the execution of emergency governmental functions, are equipped with audible and visual signals and are not subject to normal traffic regulation. These vehicles include fire trucks, hook and ladder trucks, foam or water transport trucks, police special weapons and tactics team vehicles, ambulances or other vehicles that are used in response to emergencies;

Individuals who operate commercial motor vehicles for military purposes. This exception is applicable to active duty military personnel, members of the military reserves, members of the national guard on active duty, including personnel on full-time national guard duty, personnel on part-time national guard training, civilian national guard military technicians who are required to wear military uniforms and active duty United States coast guard personnel.

The department of transportation shall by rule and regulation grant to any person or class of persons specified under subsection (a) of this section any exemption from the requirements of this title that is granted by the secretary of the United States department of transportation.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-106

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2004, ch. 11, § 1; 2015 ch. 100, § 1, effective July 1, 2015; 2017 ch. 97, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in the introductory paragraph of (a), substituted “the licensing requirements of this article” for “compliance with this act” or “this act,” and “title 49 of the United States Code” for “49 U.S.C. § 10526.”

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “from the requirements of any rule” for “with
any rule, ” and deleted “the licensing requirements of” following “pursuant to”; in
(a)(i)(A), added “including operation by employees or family members”; rewrote (a)(i)(B), (a)(ii), and (a)(iii); and made a related change.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in the introductory language of (a), added “and other” following “licensing”; in (a)(i)(B), added “exempted under
W.S. 31-18-103(a)”; and added (b).

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2017, ch. 97 , § 2, provides: "The department of transportation shall adopt any rules necessary to implement this act on or before July 1, 2017."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

§ 31-7-304.
Issuance; classifications and endorsements.

Commercial driver’s licenses may be issued with the following classifications and endorsements. The holder of a valid commercial driver’s license may drive all vehicles in the class for which that license is issued and all lesser classes of vehicles except motorcycles and vehicles which require a separate endorsement, unless the proper endorsement appears on the license:

Classifications:

Class “A” consists of any combination of vehicles with a gross combination weight rating of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) pounds or more, provided the gross vehicle weight rating of the vehicle or vehicles being towed is in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds;

Class “B” consists of any single vehicle with a gross vehicle weight rating of twenty-six thousand one (26,001) or more pounds, or any such vehicle towing a vehicle which is not in excess of ten thousand (10,000) pounds;

Class “C” consists of any single vehicle or combination of vehicles that does not meet the definition of a class “A” or class “B” vehicle as contained herein, but that either is designed to transport sixteen (16) or more passengers including the driver or is placarded for transportation of hazardous materials.

The following driver’s license endorsements are special authorizations permitting the driver to operate certain types of motor vehicles or transport certain types of cargo if the endorsement is displayed on the driver’s license:

“H” authorizes the operation of a vehicle transporting hazardous materials;

“N” authorizes the operation of a vehicle which is designed to transport as its primary cargo any liquid, bulk or gaseous material within a tank having a designed capacity of one thousand (1,000) gallons or more and attached to the vehicle;

“P” authorizes the driver to operate a bus or any motor vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(iii) used for the transportation of passengers, providing the licensed driver has attained the age of eighteen (18) years;

“T” authorizes a class “A” vehicle to be operated while pulling more than one (1) trailer;

“X” represents a combination of “H” and “N” endorsements;

Repealed by Laws 2004, ch. 11, § 2.

“S” authorizes the driver to operate a bus or any motor vehicle as defined in W.S. 31-7-102(a)(iii) used for the transportation of preschool, elementary or secondary school students from home to school, school to home or to and from school sponsored events.

Before issuing a commercial driver’s license, the department shall obtain driving record information through the commercial driver license information system, through the National Driver Register, and from each state in which the person has been licensed.

Within ten (10) days after issuing a commercial driver’s license, the department shall notify the commercial driver license information system of the issuance and provide all information required to ensure identification of the person.

The commercial driver’s license shall expire as provided by W.S.

31-7-119

.

When applying for renewal of a commercial driver’s license, the applicant must complete the application form required by W.S.

31-7-111

and provide updated information and required certifications. The written test for a hazardous materials endorsement must be taken and passed if the person wants to retain an “H” endorsement.

Before issuing or renewing a commercial driver’s license or at any time before an applicant’s current federal medical qualification certificate expires, the department shall require that the applicant present a current federal medical qualification certificate.

Before applying for a commercial driver’s license, an applicant shall have held a commercial learner’s permit in this state or another state for not less than fourteen (14) days.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-110(b) to (e); Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2004, ch. 11, §§ 1, 2; 2005, ch. 197, § 1; 2011, ch. 31, § 1; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, added (a)(ii)(G) and (f), and repealed former (a)(ii)(F), pertaining to driver's license endorsement K.

The 2005 amendment,

effective September 16, 2005, in (a)(ii)(C), deleted the exception for specified licensed drivers between 16 and 18 at the end.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (f), inserted “or at any time before an applicant's current federal medical qualification certificate expires.”

The 2013 amendment,

effective January 1, 2014, added (g).

Applicability. —

Laws 2005, ch. 197, § 3, makes the act applicable to persons applying for a license or permit who are under the age of 17 on September 16, 2005, and who do not have a valid driver's license from Wyoming or another jurisdiction.

Probationary driving privileges cannot extend to commercial vehicles. —

This chapter limits the hearing examiner's discretion to issue probationary driver's licenses during suspensions, in that probationary driving privileges cannot extend to the operation of commercial motor vehicles. Wilson v. State, 841 P.2d 90,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1992) (decided under former §

31-17-105

).

§ 31-7-305.
Disqualification and cancellation; right to a hearing.

Any person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than one (1) year if convicted of a first violation arising from separate incidents of:

Driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle under the influence of alcohol or a controlled substance to a degree which renders him incapable of safely driving a motor vehicle;

Driving or in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood, breath or other bodily substance is four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more;

Knowingly and willfully leaving the scene of an accident involving a motor vehicle driven by the person;

Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony;

Refusal to submit to a test to determine the driver’s alcohol concentration while driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle;

Driving a commercial vehicle when, as a result of prior convictions, the driver’s driving privileges are cancelled, suspended or revoked, or the driver is disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle;

Causing a fatality through the negligent operation of a commercial vehicle, including but not limited to homicide by motor vehicle, negligent homicide, motor vehicle manslaughter or a similar local ordinance or similar state law from another jurisdiction;

Driving or being in actual physical control of a motor vehicle while the alcohol concentration of the person’s blood, breath or other bodily substance is eight one-hundredths of one percent (0.08%) or more; or

Violating any local ordinance or state law in another jurisdiction which is substantially similar to any of the violations listed in this subsection.

If any of the violations provided in subsection (a) of this section occurred while transporting a hazardous material required to be placarded in accordance with 49 C.F.R. §§ 172.500 through 172.558 [49 C.F.R. §§ 172.500 through 172.560], the person is disqualified for a period of not less than three (3) years.

A person may be disqualified for life if convicted of two (2) or more violations of any of the offenses specified in subsection (a) of this section or any combination of those offenses arising from two (2) or more separate incidents. Only offenses committed after the effective date of this act apply to this subsection.

The department shall issue regulations establishing guidelines and conditions under which a disqualification for life under subsection (c) of this section may be reduced to a period of not less than ten (10) years. Any person whose disqualification for life has been reduced under this subsection and who is subsequently convicted of another disqualifying offense under subsection (a) of this section shall not be again eligible for a reduction under this subsection. The guidelines and conditions shall be in compliance with the Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, P.L. 99-570 and 49 C.F.R. § 383.51.

A person shall be disqualified for life from driving a commercial motor vehicle for:

Using a motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving the manufacture, distribution or dispensing of a controlled substance, or possession with intent to manufacture, distribute or dispense a controlled substance;

Using a commercial motor vehicle in the commission of any felony involving human trafficking under W.S.

6-2-702

or

6-2-703

.

A person may be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of not less than sixty (60) days if convicted of two (2) serious traffic violations or one hundred twenty (120) days if convicted of three (3) serious traffic violations, committed in a motor vehicle arising from separate incidents occurring within a three (3) year period.

A driver who is convicted of violating an out-of-service order may be disqualified for a period of:

Not less than one hundred eighty (180) days nor more than one (1) year if the driver is convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order;

Not less than two (2) years nor more than five (5) years if, during any ten (10) year period, the driver is convicted of two (2) separate violations of out-of-service orders in separate incidents;

Not less than three (3) years nor more than five (5) years if, during any ten (10) year period, the driver is convicted of three (3) or more violations of out-of-service orders in separate incidents;

Not less than one hundred eighty (180) days nor more than two (2) years if the driver is convicted of a first violation of an out-of-service order while transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq., or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport more than fifteen (15) passengers, including the driver. A driver is disqualified for a period of not less than three (3) years nor more than five (5) years if, during any ten (10) year period, the driver is convicted of any subsequent violations of out-of-service orders, in separate incidents, while transporting hazardous materials required to be placarded under the Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, or while operating motor vehicles designed to transport more than fifteen (15) passengers, including the driver.

For offenses specified in this subsection relating to a railroad-highway crossing, a person who holds, or is required to have, a commercial driver’s license is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days if convicted of a first offense under this subsection, for a period of one hundred twenty (120) days if convicted of a second offense under this subsection in a separate incident within a three (3) year period, or for a period of one (1) year for a third or subsequent conviction under this subsection within a three (3) year period for driving a commercial motor vehicle in violation of state or local law or regulation pertaining to one (1) of the following offenses at a railroad-highway crossing:

For drivers who are not required to stop at all railroad-highway crossings, failing to slow down and check that the tracks are clear of an approaching train or other on-track equipment;

For drivers who are not required to stop at all railroad-highway crossings, failing to stop before reaching the crossing if the tracks are not clear;

For drivers who are always required to stop at all railroad-highway crossings, failing to stop before driving onto the crossing;

For all drivers, failing to have sufficient space to drive completely through the crossing without stopping;

For all drivers, failing to obey a traffic control device or the directions of an enforcement official at the crossing; or

For all drivers, failing to negotiate a crossing because of insufficient undercarriage clearance.

After suspending, revoking, disqualifying or canceling a commercial driver license, the state licensing authority shall update its records to reflect that action within ten (10) days. After suspending, revoking, disqualifying or canceling a nonresident commercial driver’s privileges, the department shall notify the licensing authority of the state which issued the commercial driver license within ten (10) days.

Before a person is disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle under this act, the department shall notify the person and provide an opportunity for a hearing and appeal in accordance with the provisions of W.S.

31-7-105

.

A disqualification under this section does not affect the department’s authority to suspend, revoke, cancel or deny a license under any other law.

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 31, § 2.

A person may be disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle, or the department may downgrade a person’s commercial driver’s license to a noncommercial driver’s license, if the person fails to provide a current federal medical qualification certificate when requested by the department.

If an applicant for a commercial driver’s license or a commercial learner’s permit has been found to have made a false application or been convicted of making a false application, the applicant may have his commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit cancelled and be disqualified from operating a commercial motor vehicle for a period of sixty (60) days.

Upon the department receiving credible information that the holder of a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit is suspected of obtaining the license in a fraudulent manner, the state shall notify the license holder in writing at the address on file that they have thirty (30) days to contact the department and schedule retesting. The notification shall specify what tests must be retaken. If the license holder does not contact the department, does not take the test required or fails any rescheduled test, the license holder shall have his license cancelled. Once cancelled, the license holder shall be required to reapply to the department to obtain a commercial driver’s license or commercial learner’s permit.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-111

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4; 1996, ch. 21, § 1; 2004, ch. 11, § 1; 2005, ch. 230, § 1; 2006, ch. 114, § 1; 2011, ch. 31, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014; 2013 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013; 2022 ch. 45, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “motor vehicle” for “commercial motor vehicle” or “commercial vehicle” throughout the section; added (a)(vi), (a)(vii), and present (h); redesignated existing (h) through (k) as present (j) through (m); and added (n).

The 2005 amendment

deleted “or” from the end of (a)(v).

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 13, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 10, 2005.

The 2006 amendment,

substituted “49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.” for “(49 U.S.C. §§ 1801-1813)” in (g)(iv).

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, added (a)(viii) and (a)(ix); in (g)(i), substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “ninety (90) days”; in (g)(ii), substituted “two (2) years” for “one (1) year”; repealed former (n) which read: “A discharge or dismissal under W.S.

7-13-301

shall not limit the authority of the department to disqualify a driver from operating a commercial vehicle if the discharge or dismissal under W.S.

7-13-301

is from an offense specified in this section and the person has been placed on probation as provided in W.S. 7-13-301(a)”; added (o); and made related changes.

The 2013 amendments. —

The first 2013 amendment, by ch. 71, § 1, effective January 1, 2014, added (p) and (q).

The second 2013 amendment, by ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2013 added “or other on-track equipment” following “approaching train” in (h)(i).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (d), added the second sentence, added “and 49 C.F.R. § 383.51” at the end of the present
third sentence; in the introductory language of (e), substituted “shall” for “may,” added “for life,” deleted “life who uses” at the end; added the (e)(i) designation; added “Using” at the beginning of (e)(i); added (e)(ii); and made related changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4, renumbered former §

31-17-111

as present §

31-7-305

.

The Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, P.L. 99-570, referred to in subsection (d), was repealed by P.L. 103-372. For present similar provisions, see 49 U.S.C. § 31100 et seq.

The Hazardous Materials Transportation Act, 49 U.S.C. §§ 1801 through 1813, referred to in paragraph (g)(iv), was also repealed by P.L. 103-372. For present similar provisions, see 49 U.S.C. § 5101 et seq.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see
§ 31-7-102(a)(xlix).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 230, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 3, provides: “[A]ny other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Constitutionality. —

Commercial truck driver's argument that Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-305(n) violated his equal protection rights by inflicting a greater burden on commercial drivers than non-commercial drivers failed, because the driver conceded that the constitutionality of this section had been upheld in Wilson v. State ex rel. Office of Hearing Exam'r, 841 P.2d 90 (Wyo. 1992),
and the driver's briefs included no persuasive argument for revisiting the issue and overturning the prior action. King v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT, 2007 WY 109, 161 P.3d 1086,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2007).

Because a driver's license was not a fundamental right, but a privilege, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xxv), due process was not violated by the utilization of a preponderance of the evidence in commercial driver's license revocation proceedings under this section and Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-7-307

.
State v. Robbins, 2011 WY 23, 246 P.3d 864,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2011).

Implied consent advisements. —

Because there was substantial evidence in the record to sustain a conclusion that a driver was given complete implied consent advisements and that he was not misled about what his rights were under the implied consent laws, court refused to second-guess the credibility determination made by a hearing officer leading to an implied consent suspension and a commercial vehicle disqualification.
Hittner v. State ex rel. Wyo. DOT (In re Hittner), 2008 WY 91, 189 P.3d 872,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 95

(Wyo. 2008).

Intentional failure or refusal to perform breath test. —

Substantial evidence supported a hearing examiner's finding that a motorist intentionally failed or refused to perform a breath test after the motorist was arrested for driving under the influence of intoxicating liquor. Intentional failure constituted a refusal to take the breath test, which refusal led to the statutory implied consent suspension of the motorist's driving privileges and the additional statutory disqualification from driving a commercial motor vehicle.
Faber v. State, 2009 WY 137, 220 P.3d 236,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2009).

Existence of probable cause. —

Where a defendant appealed the decision by the Wyoming Department of Transportation to disqualify him from driving a commercial vehicle for one year, there was substantial evidence to support the hearing examiner's findings of fact regarding probable cause for his arrest. Considering the totality of the circumstances, including the results of his field sobriety tests, the moderate smell of alcohol on his breath, his poor balance, and his admission to having consumed alcohol, a state trooper had probable cause to arrest him. McCallie v. DOT, 2014 WY 18, 317 P.3d 1142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2014).

Existence of substantial evidence. —

Where a defendant appealed the decision by the Wyoming Department of Transportation to disqualify him from driving a commercial vehicle for one year, the record contained substantial evidence to support the hearing examiner's findings that, as set forth in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-305(a)(ii), defendant was driving or in control of a commercial vehicle and that he had an alcohol concentration of 0.04 percent or more at the time. McCallie v. DOT, 2014 WY 18, 317 P.3d 1142,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 2014).

§ 31-7-306.
Commercial drivers prohibited from operating with any alcohol in system.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this title, a person may not drive, operate or be in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol in his system.

A person who drives, operates or is in physical control of a commercial motor vehicle while having alcohol in his system as provided by W.S.

31-7-307

shall be placed out-of-service for twenty-four (24) hours.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-112

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2011, ch. 178, § 1.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, in (b), deleted “or who refuses to take a test to determine his alcohol concentration” preceding “as provided.”

§ 31-7-307.
Implied consent requirements for commercial motor vehicle drivers.

A person who drives or is in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle within this state is deemed to have given consent, subject to the provisions of this section to a chemical test or tests of his blood, breath or urine for the purpose of determining alcohol or controlled substance concentration in his blood.

The test or tests shall be administered at the direction of a peace officer, who has probable cause to believe that the driver was driving or in actual physical control of a commercial motor vehicle in this state while having alcohol or a controlled substance in his system. The peace officer who requires a test pursuant to this section may direct that the test shall be of blood, breath or urine. However, if the officer directs that the test be of the person’s blood or urine, the person may choose whether the test shall be of blood or urine. The person has this option unless the peace officer has probable cause to believe there is a controlled substance which is not subject to testing by a blood or breath test in which case a urine test may be required.

For tests required under this section, the person shall be advised that:

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 178, § 2.

If the results of the test indicate a blood alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more, it shall result in a disqualification for a period of not less than one (1) year to life;

If the results of the test indicate a blood alcohol concentration of less than four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%), he shall be placed out-of-service for twenty-four (24) hours;

He may go to the nearest hospital or clinic and secure any or all required tests at his own expense or any remaining required tests shall be administered by a person at a place and in a manner prescribed by and at the expense of the agency employing the peace officer.

Results of tests obtained at the person’s expense shall be made available to the peace officer and the person. Disclosure of the test results by the person administering the test is not a violation of the doctor-patient relationship.

Any person dead, unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering him incapable of cooperating with the administration of the tests is deemed to have given his consent provided for in this section, and the tests may be administered subject to this section. A chemical test designated by the agency employing the peace officer may also be administered to a person who refuses to take a test upon issuance of a search warrant, including a remotely communicated search warrant, as provided in W.S. 31-6-102(d). A remotely communicated search warrant shall be valid only for purposes specified in this subsection.

If the person refuses testing or is administered a test which discloses an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more by weight of alcohol in the person’s blood the peace officer shall submit a signed statement to the department. The statement submitted by the officer shall contain:

His probable cause to believe the person was driving or in actual physical control of a commercial vehicle:

In this state;

With alcohol or a controlled substance in his system.

That a test was requested pursuant to this section; and

That the person refused to submit to a test or submitted to a test which disclosed an alcohol concentration of four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) or more.

Upon receipt of the signed statement of a peace officer submitted under subsection (f) of this section, the department shall disqualify the driver from driving a commercial motor vehicle under W.S.

31-7-305

subject to the hearing provision therein.

A timely request for a hearing shall stay the disqualification until the order following the hearing is entered provided the stay of disqualification is effective only so long as there is no disqualification for a similar violation during the hearing and appeal period.

At the conclusion of a hearing, the hearing examiner shall order the disqualification be rescinded or sustained. The scope of the hearing shall be limited to the issues of:

Whether the peace officer had probable cause to believe the person was driving or in actual physical control of a commercial vehicle with alcohol or a controlled substance in his system;

Whether the results of a test indicated there was at least four one-hundredths of one percent (0.04%) of alcohol in the person’s blood; and

Whether the person had been given the advisement required in subsection (c) of this section.

Prehearing discovery available to any party is limited to access to the notice of disqualification, signed statement, and any accompanying documentation submitted by the peace officer. Other types of discovery available under other laws are not available under this section.

If a person under arrest refuses to submit to a chemical test under this section, evidence of the refusal is admissible in any administrative, civil or criminal action or proceeding arising from acts alleged to have been committed while driving or in actual physical control of a commercial vehicle.

W.S. 31-6-102(g), 31-6-104(c), 31-6-105(a), (b) and (e) and

31-6-106

apply to this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-113

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4; 2011, ch. 178, §§ 1, 2.

The 2011 amendment,

effective July 1, 2011, repealed former (c)(i), pertaining to failure to submit to chemical tests; substituted “If the results of the test” for “If a test is taken and the results” in (c)(ii) and (c)(iii); in (e), substituted “cooperating with the administration of” for “refusal to submit to,” and added the last two sentences; in the introductory language of (f), substituted “is administered” for “submits to”; and in (j)(ii), substituted “results of a test” for “person refused to submit to a test or if he submitted to a test, the results.”

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (l) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 4, renumbered this section, which was former §

31-17-113

.

Constitutionality. —

Because a driver's license was not a fundamental right, but a privilege, under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 31-7-102(a)(xxv), due process was not violated by the utilization of a preponderance of the evidence in commercial driver's license revocation proceedings under Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

31-7-305

and this section.
State v. Robbins, 2011 WY 23, 246 P.3d 864,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 2011).

Quoted

in

McCallie v. DOT, 2014 WY 18,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Feb 4, 2014); Dubbelde v. State ex rel. DOT, 2014 WY 63,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(May 15, 2014).

§ 31-7-308.
Notification of traffic convictions.

Within ten (10) days after receiving a report of the conviction of any nonresident holder of a commercial driver’s license for any violation of state or federal law or local ordinance relating to motor vehicle traffic control, other than parking violations, committed in a commercial motor vehicle, the department shall notify the driver licensing authority in the licensing state of the conviction.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

31-17-114

; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

§ 31-7-309.
Driving record information to be furnished.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall furnish full information regarding the driving record of any person:

To the driver license administrator of any other state or province or territory of Canada requesting the information;

To any employer or prospective employer upon request and payment of the required fee;

To insurers upon request and payment of the required fee;

To a transportation network company to evaluate a prospective transportation network company driver as required by W.S.

31-20-106

upon payment of the required fee.

The department shall determine the amount of the fee prescribed by this section to cover the actual cost of providing the information.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-115; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2017 ch. 132, § 2, effective March 3, 2017.

The 2017 amendment

added (a)(iv).

Laws 2017, ch. 132, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2017.

§ 31-7-310.
Rulemaking authority.

The department shall adopt rules and regulations necessary to carry out the provisions of this article and the requirements of the federal motor carrier safety regulations in title 49, Code of Federal Regulations.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-116; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3; 2004, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, substituted “shall adopt” for “may adopt” and added the language beginning “and the requirements” to the end of the section.

§ 31-7-311.
Authority to enter agreements.

The department may make agreements, arrangements or declarations to carry out the provisions of this article specifically, but not limited to certifying third parties to conduct tests of applicants required under this article.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-117; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

§ 31-7-312.
Reciprocity.

Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, a person may drive a commercial motor vehicle in this state if the person has a commercial driver’s license issued by any state or provinces or territories of Canada in accordance with the minimum federal standards for the issuance of a commercial motor vehicle driver’s license, if the person’s driver’s license is not suspended, revoked or canceled and if the person is not disqualified from driving a commercial motor vehicle or subject to an out-of-service order.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 176, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 31-17-118; Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 3.

§ 31-7-313.
Temporary commercial driver license; fees.

If a person has his driving privileges suspended or revoked for a violation committed while driving a noncommercial vehicle the department shall not issue a temporary commercial driver’s license to be used by the person to drive a commercial motor vehicle for the period of the suspension or revocation. The department may issue a noncommercial temporary license as specified in W.S.

31-7-105

if the person is otherwise eligible. The fee for the temporary license shall be the same as for a noncommercial driver’s license under W.S. 31-7-113(a).

History.

Laws 1993, ch. 145, § 1; 2004, ch. 11, § 1.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, rewrote the section, which formerly pertained to issuance of a temporary commercial driver's license for employment purposes only.